Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-207
Prior notarial acts; effect.

A notarial act performed prior to August 25, 1969, is not affected by sections 64-201 to 64-210. Sections 64-201 to 64-210 provide an additional method of proving notarial acts. Nothing in sections 64-201 to 64-210 diminishes or invalidates the recognition accorded to notarial acts by other laws or regulations of this state.

Laws 1969, c. 523, § 7, p. 2144.